District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.71

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term “lateral law enforcement officer” means:

(1)

(A)

A member of the Capitol Police;

(B)

A member of the United States Park Police;

(C)

A member of the Federal Protective Service;

(D)

A member of the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division; or

(E)

An employee, the duties of whose position are primarily the investigation, apprehension, or detention of individuals suspected or convicted of offenses against the criminal laws of the United States of America or any state of the United States of America, including the positions of county sheriff and municipal policeman; or

(2)

A person who has performed in any capacity described in paragraph (1) of this section within 12 months of his or her application to the Metropolitan Police Department.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1071
as added Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 102(b), 47 DCR 4619

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-611.71.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-305, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2701).